Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4611.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to equalize income rights of husband and wife spouses in real estate and other property, held as tenants by the entirety. Sec. 1. A husband and wife shall be Spouses are equally entitled to the rents, products, income, or profits, and to the control and management of real or personal property held by them as tenants by the entirety. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution ____ (request no. S00781'25) or House Joint Resolution F (request no. H00781'25) of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.